Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS
26-1-126. County contingency fund - county tax base relief fund - creation.

Repealed.

(1.5) There is hereby created the county tax base relief fund, which shall be expended to supplement county expenditures for public assistance, as provided in this section.

Subject to available appropriations, the state department of human services or the state department of health care policy and financing shall make an advancement, in addition to that provided in section

26-1-122

, out of the county tax base relief fund to any county that is eligible for a non-zero amount calculated by using the formula described in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.

(2.1) (a) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1809, § 2, effective June 2, 2008.)

For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2008, and for each fiscal year thereafter, a county's qualification for an advancement from the county tax base relief fund during the fiscal year shall be based upon a three-tiered system whereby a county may qualify for a distribution of moneys from one or more tiers. For any fiscal year in which appropriations to the county tax base relief fund are insufficient to provide advancements from each tier as described in subsections (3) and (4) of this section:

Any moneys appropriated to the county tax base relief fund shall first be used to provide advancements from tier 1;

If sufficient moneys are appropriated to provide all advancements from tier 1, the remaining moneys shall be used to provide advancements from tier 2; and

If sufficient moneys are appropriated to provide all advancements from tier 1 and tier 2, the remaining moneys shall be used to provide advancements from tier 3.

Subject to available appropriations, the amount of the additional advancement for each county for each month commencing on or after July 1, 2008, shall be the total of amounts calculated for each of the three tiers from which the county qualifies to receive a distribution of moneys pursuant to section 26-1-126 (2.1)(b), as follows:

A distribution of moneys from tier 1 shall be calculated as seventy-five percent of the remainder of the equation X minus Y, where:

X equals the sum of the monthly amount of the county's obligations pursuant to section 26-1-122 and the county share of the monthly amount expended for administrative costs of medical assistance pursuant to section 25.5-1-122, C.R.S., and section 26-1-122; and

Y equals the amount of moneys that would be raised by a levy of 3.0 mills on the property valued for assessment in the county, divided by twelve.

For a county not receiving a distribution of moneys from tier 1, the distribution from tier 2 shall be calculated as fifty percent of the remainder of the equation X minus Y, where:

X equals the sum of the monthly amount of the county's obligations pursuant to section 26-1-122 and the county share of the monthly amount expended for administrative costs of medical assistance pursuant to section 25.5-1-122, C.R.S., and section 26-1-122; and

Y equals the amount of moneys that would be raised by a levy of 2.5 mills on the property valued for assessment in the county, divided by twelve.

For a county that receives a distribution of moneys from tier 1, the distribution from tier 2 shall be calculated as fifty percent of the remainder of the equation X minus Y, where:

X equals the amount of moneys that would be raised by a levy of 3.0 mills on the property valued for assessment in the county, divided by twelve; and

Y equals the amount of moneys that would be raised by a levy of 2.5 mills on the property valued for assessment in the county, divided by twelve.

For a county not receiving a distribution of moneys from tier 2, the distribution from tier 3 shall be calculated as twenty-five percent of the remainder of the equation X minus Y, where:

X equals the sum of the monthly amount of the county's obligations pursuant to section 26-1-122 and the county share of the monthly amount expended for administrative costs of medical assistance pursuant to section 25.5-1-122, C.R.S., and section 26-1-122; and

Y equals the amount of moneys that would be raised by a levy of 2.0 mills on the property valued for assessment in the county, divided by twelve.

For a county that receives a distribution of moneys from tier 2, the distribution from tier 3 shall be calculated as twenty-five percent of the remainder of the equation X minus Y, where:

X equals the amount of moneys that would be raised by a levy of 2.5 mills on the property valued for assessment in the county, divided by twelve; and

Y equals the amount of moneys that would be raised by a levy of 2.0 mills on the property valued for assessment in the county, divided by twelve.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of subsection (2.1) of this section, in the event appropriations are insufficient to cover advancements from one or more tiers as provided for in this section, the advancements from a tier from which appropriations are insufficient to cover all advancements from that tier shall be advanced to each county that is eligible to receive an advancement from that tier in an equitable manner, such that each such county shall have the same proportion of the county's obligations paid through the combination of its property tax revenue available and its advancement from the county tax base relief fund.
(4) (a) (I) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of subsection (2.1) of this section, in the event appropriations are insufficient to cover advancements from one or more tiers as provided for in this section, the advancements from a tier from which appropriations are insufficient to cover all advancements from that tier shall be advanced to each county that is eligible to receive an advancement from that tier in an equitable manner, such that each such county shall have the same proportion of the county's obligations paid through the combination of its property tax revenue available and its advancement from the county tax base relief fund.

As used in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a):

"County's obligations" means a county department's share of the overall cost of providing the assistance payments, food stamps (except the value of food stamp coupons), and social services activities delivered in the county, including the costs allocated to the administration of each, as described in section 26-1-122; and the county share of the administrative costs of medical assistance in the county, as described in section 25.5-1-122, C.R.S.

"Property tax revenue available" means the amount of moneys that would be raised by a levy of 3.0 mills on the property valued for assessment in the county if moneys are insufficient to cover advancements from tier 1, the amount of moneys that would be raised by a levy of 2.5 mills on the property valued for assessment in the county if moneys are insufficient to cover advancements from tier 2, or the amount of moneys that would be raised by a levy of 2.0 mills on the property valued for assessment in the county if moneys are insufficient to cover advancements from tier 3.

The executive director of the department may, on or after May 1 of any fiscal year and before the forty-fifth day after the close of the fiscal year:

The transfers authorized by subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) shall be in addition to any other transfers within the department that are authorized by law or that are authorized in the general appropriation act and are required to implement appropriations conditioned on the distribution or transfer of the appropriated amounts.

The total amount of moneys transferred pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) shall not exceed one million dollars for any fiscal year.

(A) Transfer unexpended general fund moneys in the county tax base relief fund line item of the general appropriation act to offset general fund over-expenditures in the county administration line in the general appropriation act; and

(B) Transfer unexpended general fund moneys in the county administration line in the general appropriation act to offset general fund over-expenditures in the county tax base relief fund line item of the general appropriation act.

Each county eligible for county tax base relief fund moneys pursuant to this section shall only be responsible for an amount equal to the county's pro rata share of the general assembly's appropriation to the county tax base relief fund. If state and county appropriations are insufficient to meet the administrative and program costs of public assistance and the administrative costs of medical assistance and food stamps, then the executive director of the department of human services, the executive director of the department of health care policy and financing, and the state board of human services shall act pursuant to sections 26-1-121 (1)(c) and 26-1-122 (5) to reduce the rate of expenditure so that it matches the available funds.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1177, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-1-25.

L. 74:

Entire section amended, p. 356, § 1, effective May 17.

L. 75:

(2), (3),and (4) amended, p. 886, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(2), IP(3), and (4) amended and (5) added, p. 289, § 2, effective June 11.

L. 87:

(2.1) added, p. 1156, § 3, effective June 16.

L. 89:

(2), (2.1)(a), and (3)(b) amended and (2.1)(b) R&RE, pp. 1190, 1191, §§ 1, 3, 2, effective April 5.

L. 93:

(2) and (5) amended, p. 1146, § 86, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1227, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1809, § 2, effective June 2.

L. 2010:

(2.1)(b) and (4)(a) amended and (6) added, (SB 10-149), ch. 94, p. 321, § 1, effective April 15.

L. 2011:

(4)(a) amended, (SB 11-228), ch. 156, p. 541, § 1, effective May 5.

26-1-126.5. Effect of supreme court's interpretation of section 26-1-126, creating the county contingency fund for public assistance and welfare programs.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the Colorado supreme court decision entitled

Colorado Department of Social Services v. Board of County Commissioners of the County of Pueblo and Samuel J. Corsentino

, No. 83SA316, March 11, 1985, which interpreted section 26-1-126 to require the general assembly to fully fund the county contingency fund, leaving no discretion with the general assembly to determine annually the level of funding of said fund, has not been adopted by the general assembly. The general assembly specifically rejects this interpretation and any implication in such decision which would result in any state liability for amounts not appropriated for such fund in previous fiscal years.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 290, § 3, effective June 11.

Cross references:

For the provision outlining the general assembly's discretion to establish levels of funding for programs, see § 2-4-215; for limitations on the funding of statutorily created programs, see § 2-4-216; for the Colorado Supreme Court decision Colorado Department of Social Services v. Board of County Commissioners of the County of Pueblo and Samuel J. Corsentino, see 697 P.2d 1 (Colo. 1985).

26-1-127. Fraudulent acts.

Any person who obtains or any person who willfully aids or abets another to obtain public assistance or vendor payments or medical assistance as defined in this title 26 or child care assistance as described in part 1 of article 4 of title 26.5 to which the person is not entitled or in an amount greater than that to which the person is justly entitled or payment of any forfeited installment grants or benefits to which the person is not entitled or in a greater amount than that to which the person is entitled, by means of a willfully false statement or representation, or by impersonation, or by any other fraudulent device, commits the crime of theft, which crime is classified in accordance with section 18-4-401 (2) and which crime is punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401 if the crime is classified as a felony, or section 18-1.3-501 if the crime is classified as a misdemeanor. To the extent not otherwise prohibited by state or federal law, any person violating the provisions of this subsection (1) is disqualified from participation in the program pursuant to article 2 of this title 26 or part 1 of article 4 of title 26.5 in which a recipient is found to have committed an intentional program violation for one year for a first offense, two years for a second offense, and permanently for a third or subsequent offense. Such disqualification is mandatory and is in addition to any other penalty imposed by law.

(1.5) To the extent not otherwise prohibited by state or federal law, any person against whom a county department of social services, the state department, or the department of early childhood obtains a civil judgment in a state or federal court of record in this state based on allegations that the person obtained or willfully aided and abetted another to obtain public assistance or vendor payments or medical assistance as defined in this title 26 or child care assistance as described in part 1 of article 4 of title 26.5 to which the person is not entitled or in an amount greater than that to which the person is justly entitled or payment of any forfeited installment grants or benefits to which the person is not entitled or in a greater amount than that to which the person is entitled, by means of a willfully false statement or representation, or by impersonation, or by any other fraudulent device, is disqualified from participation in the program pursuant to article 2 of this title 26 or part 1 of article 4 of title 26.5 in which a recipient is found to have committed an intentional program violation for one year for a first incident, two years for a second incident, and permanently for a third or subsequent incident. Such disqualification is mandatory and is in addition to any other remedy available to a judgment creditor.

If, at any time during the continuance of public assistance pursuant to this title 26 or child care assistance pursuant to part 1 of article 4 of title 26.5, the recipient acquires any property or receives any increase in income or property, or both, in excess of that declared at the time of determination or redetermination of eligibility or if there is any other change in circumstances affecting the recipient's eligibility, it shall be the duty of the recipient to notify the county department within thirty days in writing or take steps to secure county assistance to prepare such notification in writing of the acquisition of such property, receipt of such income, or change in such circumstances; and any recipient of such public assistance who knowingly fails to do so commits a petty offense and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503. If such property or income is received infrequently or irregularly and does not exceed a total value of ninety dollars in any calendar quarter, such property or income is excluded from the thirty-day written reporting requirement but must be reported at the time of the next redetermination of eligibility of a recipient.

The county departments shall use an application form which contains appropriate and conspicuous notice of the penalties for fraud and shall deliver to each recipient, with the first check and each redetermination thereafter, a notice explaining what changes in circumstances require written notification to the county department under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2). The county department shall make available suitable forms which may be used for the purposes of this notification.

Any recipient or vendor who falsifies any report required pursuant to this title 26 or part 1 of article 4 of title 26.5 commits a petty offense and is punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503.

Subject to available appropriations, additional costs incurred by the district attorneys in enforcing this section shall be billed to the county departments in the judicial district in such proportion for each county as specified in section 20-1-302, C.R.S., and the county departments shall pay such costs as an expense of public assistance administration.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the state department, county departments, or district attorney may elect, in the alternative, to prosecute under the general criminal statutes.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1333, § 3, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 79:

(6) repealed, p. 1093, § 2, effective June 21.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1371, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 846, § 118, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 2062, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1) and (1.5) amended, p. 1229, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1), (2)(a), and (3) amended, p. 1538, § 272, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(1) and (1.5) amended, (SB 20-206), ch. 222, p. 1095, § 1, effective July 2.

L. 2021:

(2)(a) and (3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3242, § 485, effective March 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

(1), (1.5), (2)(a), and (3) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 855, § 90, effective July 1.

Cross references:

(1) For fraudulent acts relating to food stamps, see §§ 26-2-305 and 26-2-306; for offenses involving fraud under the "Colorado Criminal Code", see part 1 of article 5 of title 18.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsections (1), (2)(a), and (3), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

26-1-127.5. Prevention of erroneous payments to prisoners - incentives.

In the event the identifying information transmitted to the state department and the county departments pursuant to section 17-26-118.5 (2), C.R.S., results in the termination of benefits from any program administered by the state department or county departments, the state department or county department shall pay as a reward to the sheriff ten percent of each of the following:

Any portion of one month's benefit that would have been payable to the incarcerated recipient that consists of state or county moneys;

Any portion of one month's benefit that would have been payable to the incarcerated recipient that consists of federal moneys granted to the state or counties, unless federal law prohibits the use of such grant moneys for the purpose specified in this subsection (1);

Any portion of one month's benefit that would have been payable to the incarcerated recipient that consists of federal moneys made available by waiver for the purpose specified in this subsection (1).

The executive director may apply for any federal waivers necessary to maximize the amount of the incentive payments to sheriffs.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), the state department or county departments shall not pay a reward to a sheriff for providing identifying information pursuant to subsection (1) of this section in connection with a participant in the Colorado works program, created pursuant to part 7 of article 2 of this title, unless the federal government permits any amount paid as a reward to qualify as an expenditure for the purposes of meeting the state maintenance of historic effort required pursuant to section 26-2-713.

The state department or county departments shall not pay a reward as authorized under this section if the state or county costs of implementing the provisions of this section exceed the overall saving of state or county moneys that the state department or county departments estimate shall be realized by implementing this section.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 553, § 2, effective August 4.

26-1-128. Report required. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1336, § 9, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 80:

Entire section repealed, p. 795, § 56, effective June 5.

26-1-129. Comprehensive information - packet of aged services and programs - implementation.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that, while numerous programs and services are available for the aged, their access to such programs and services is often fragmented due to a lack of knowledge and information, and, as a result, needs which could be met are not. The general assembly further finds that compiling a single information packet on all programs and services would assist the aged in utilizing these programs and services more effectively.

To assist the aged in utilizing existing programs and services for which they may become eligible at sixty-two years of age or older, the state department shall compile a list of all such programs at the federal, state, and local level.

The state department shall supervise the compilation of an information packet containing information on the said programs and services, their eligibility requirements, mode of delivery, and application forms, and shall make a single copy of the compiled information available to specified local agencies serving the aged, including the county departments of human or social services and the area agencies on aging.

The packet shall contain only the listing of federal, state, and local services and programs, referral agencies, information pamphlets, and application forms. It shall not contain any materials which represent or promote the aims of private agencies or organizations.

The designated local agencies shall:

Provide appropriate assistance to individuals utilizing the information packet; and

Coordinate client referrals to community agencies serving the aged and to institutional and noninstitutional programs, services, and activities within the community, as appropriate.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 1854, § 2, effective April 11.

L. 2018:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 451, § 134, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

26-1-130. Applications for licenses - authority to suspend licenses - rules - definitions.

Every application by an individual for a license issued by the state department or any authorized agent of said department shall require the applicant's name, address, and social security number.

The state department or any authorized agent of the state department shall deny, suspend, or revoke any license pursuant to the provisions of section 26-13-126, and any rules promulgated in furtherance thereof, if the state department or agent thereof receives a notice to deny, suspend, or revoke from the state child support enforcement agency because the licensee or applicant is out of compliance with a court or administrative order for current child support, child support debt, retroactive child support, child support arrearages, or child support when combined with maintenance or because the licensee or applicant has failed to comply with a properly issued subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity or child support proceeding. Any such denial, suspension, or revocation shall be in accordance with the procedures specified by rule of the state department and rules promulgated by the state board for the implementation of this section and section 26-13-126.

The state department shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the state child support enforcement agency, which memorandum shall identify the relative responsibilities of the state department and the state child support enforcement agency with respect to the implementation of this section and section 26-13-126.

The appropriate rule-making body of the state department is authorized to promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.

For purposes of this section, "license" means any recognition, authority, or permission that the state department or any authorized agent of said department is authorized by law to issue for an individual to practice a profession or occupation or for an individual to participate in any recreational activity. "License" may include, but is not necessarily limited to, any license, certificate, certification, letter of authorization, or registration issued for an individual to practice a profession or occupation or for an individual to participate in any recreational activity.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1286, § 31, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.

26-1-131. (Reserved)

Editor's note:

This section was originally enacted in 2004; however section 2 of chapter 328, Session Laws of Colorado 2004, provided that this section would only take effect if the department of human services provided written notice to the revisor of statutes that potential partners for a merger with the Colorado mental health institute were identified. No such notification was received by the revisor of statutes, therefore this section as it appeared in the 2004 Colorado Revised Statutes did not take effect.

26-1-132. Department of human services - rate setting - residential treatment service providers - monitoring and auditing - report.

In conjunction with the group of representatives convened by the state department pursuant to section 26-5-104 (6)(e), (6)(g), and (6)(i) to review the rate-setting process for child welfare services, the state department shall develop a rate-setting process consistent with medicaid requirements for providers of residential treatment services in Colorado. The department of health care policy and financing shall approve the rate-setting process for rates funded by medicaid. The rate-setting process developed pursuant to this section may include:

A range that represents a base-treatment rate for serving a child who is subject to out-of-home placement due to dependency and neglect, a child placed in a residential child care facility pursuant to the "Children and Youth Mental Health Treatment Act", article 67 of title 27, or a child who has been adjudicated a delinquent, which includes a defined service package to meet the needs of the child;

A request for proposal to contract for specialized service needs of a child, including but not limited to: Substance use disorder treatment and recovery services, sex offender services, and services for the intellectually and developmentally disabled; and

Negotiated incentives for achieving outcomes for the child as defined by the state department, counties, and providers.

In auditing residential treatment providers, the state department shall apply compliance requirements and monitoring functions consistently across all division and monitoring teams.

The rate-setting process developed by the state department, counties, and providers and approved by the department of health care policy and financing pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall include a two- or three-year implementation timeline with implementation beginning in state fiscal year 2008-09.

Repealed.

The department of health care policy and financing and the state department, in consultation with the group of representatives convened by the state department pursuant to section 26-5-104 (6)(e) to review the rate-setting process for child welfare services, shall review the rate-setting process every two years and shall submit any changes to the joint budget committee of the general assembly.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 115, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(1), (3), and (4) amended, p. 1992, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(a), (3), and (4) amended, p. 618, § 3, effective August 3.

L. 2010:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 802, § 71, effective April 29.

L. 2016:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (4) amended, (SB 16-201), ch. 171, p. 541, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 2017:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1331, § 214, effective May 25; (4)(a) amended, (SB 17-234), ch. 154, p. 521, § 7, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 18-1094), ch. 343, p. 2044, § 11, effective June 30.

L. 2021:

IP(1) amended, (SB 21-278), ch. 344. p. 2244, § 5, effective June 25; (1)(b) amended, (HB 21-1021), ch. 256, p. 1511, § 8, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4)(a)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (4)(a), effective January 2, 2020. (See L. 2017, p. 521.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

26-1-133. Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo - forensic unit - authority to enter into lease. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1512, § 1, effective June 9.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 287, § 3, effective March 31.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2006 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 91, Session Laws of Colorado 2006.

26-1-133.5. Rental properties - fund created.

The executive director is authorized to rent surplus facilities on the campuses of the various institutions operated by the state department so long as the rentals are not prohibited by contractual agreement, state law, or other legal restrictions on the state department's possession or use of the property. The state department shall not enter into any lease agreement that would endanger the state's ownership of the property or that is expected to result in a financial loss to the state.

All moneys collected from the rental of surplus facilities pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the department of human services buildings and grounds cash fund, which fund is hereby created and referred to in this section as the "fund".

The moneys in the fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the state department to be used in operating, repairing, remodeling, or demolishing the facilities of any properties rented by the state department pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Any moneys in the fund not expended for the purposes of subsection (3) of this section may be invested by the state treasurer as provided by law. All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or another fund.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1344, § 1, effective May 27.

26-1-134. Home- and community-based services for persons with developmental disabilities - cooperation.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the department of health care policy and financing and the state department cooperate to the maximum extent possible in designing, implementing, and administering the program authorized under part 4 of article 6 of title 25.5, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1993, § 20, effective July 1.

26-1-135. Child welfare action committee - reporting - cash fund - created.

As part of the work done by the governor's child welfare action committee, created by executive order B 006 08, the state department shall make periodic reports of findings and recommendations, including a report of the child welfare action committee's initial recommendations, to the health and human services committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, and the joint budget committee on or before January 31, 2009.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the child welfare action committee cash fund, referred to in this section as the "fund". The fund shall be comprised of moneys credited to the fund pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, and any other moneys appropriated to the fund. All interest earned on the investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) (a) (I) There is hereby created in the state treasury the child welfare action committee cash fund, referred to in this section as the "fund". The fund shall be comprised of moneys credited to the fund pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, and any other moneys appropriated to the fund. All interest earned on the investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund.

Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the department of human services to pay any necessary expenses related to the governor's child welfare action committee, created by executive order B 006 08, and the implementation of any recommendations of the committee.

Any moneys credited to the fund and unexpended at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not revert to the general fund.

Repealed.

The state department is authorized to seek and accept gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this section; except that no gift, grant, or donation may be accepted if it is subject to conditions that are inconsistent with this section or any other law of the state. All private and public moneys received through gifts, grants, or donations shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the child welfare action committee cash fund, created in subsection (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1526, § 2, effective May 28.

L. 2011:

(2)(c) added, (SB 11-226), ch. 190, p. 734, § 4, effective May 19.

L. 2015:

(2)(a)(I) amended and (2)(b) and (2)(c) repealed, (SB 15-264), ch. 259, p. 963, § 80, effective August 5.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 327, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

26-1-136. Persons in a department of human services facility - medical benefits application assistance - county of residence - rules.

Beginning as soon as practicable, but no later than January 1, 2009, no later than one hundred twenty days prior to release, state department facility personnel shall assist the following persons in applying for medical assistance pursuant to part 1 or 2 of article 5 of title 25.5, C.R.S.:

A person who was receiving medical assistance pursuant to section 25.5-5-101 (1)(f) or 25.5-5-201 (1)(j), C.R.S., immediately prior to entering the state department facility and is likely to be terminated from receiving medical assistance while committed or otherwise placed or is reasonably expected to meet the eligibility criteria specified in section 25.5-5-101 (1)(f) or 25.5-5-201 (1)(j), C.R.S., upon release; and

A person who is committed to a state department facility pursuant to part 1 of article 8 of title 16, C.R.S.; or

A person who is a patient or a juvenile who is placed in a state department facility pursuant to court order.

If the person is committed or placed for less than one hundred twenty days, state department personnel shall make a reasonable effort to assist the person in applying for medical assistance as soon as practicable.

As soon as practicable, but no later than January 1, 2009, no later than one hundred twenty days prior to release, state department facility personnel shall assist the following persons in applying for supplemental security income benefits under Title II of the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 301, et seq., as amended, and in any associated appeals process:

A person who was eligible for supplemental security income benefits under Title II of the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 301, et seq., as amended, immediately prior to entering the state department facility and is likely to be terminated from receiving supplemental security income benefits while committed or otherwise placed, or is reasonably expected to meet the eligibility criteria for supplemental security income benefits upon release; and

A person who is committed to a state department facility pursuant to part 1 of article 8 of title 16, C.R.S.; or

A person who is a patient who is placed in a state department facility pursuant to court order.

The department of health care policy and financing shall provide information and training on medical assistance eligibility requirements and assistance to the facility personnel at each facility to assist in and expedite the application process for medical assistance for a person held in custody who meets the requirements of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section.

The state department shall provide information and education regarding the supplemental security income systems and application processes to personnel at each facility.

For purposes of determining eligibility pursuant to section 25.5-4-205, C.R.S., the county of residence of the person shall be the county specified by the person as his or her county of residence upon release.

The executive director of the department of health care policy and financing shall promulgate rules to simplify the processing of applications for medical assistance pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section and to allow a person determined to be eligible for such medical assistance to access the medical assistance upon release and thereafter. If a county department determines that a person is eligible for medical assistance, the county shall enroll the person in medicaid effective upon his or her release. At the time of the person's release, the facility personnel shall give the person information and paperwork necessary for the person to access medical assistance. The information shall be provided to the facility by the applicable county department.

Each state department facility shall attempt to enter into prerelease agreements with local social security administration offices, and, if appropriate, the county department or the department of health care policy and financing in order to:

Simplify the processing of applications for medical assistance or for supplemental security income to enroll, effective upon release, a person who is eligible for medical assistance pursuant to section 25.5-5-101 (1)(f) or 25.5-5-201 (1)(j), C.R.S.; and

Provide the person with the information and paperwork necessary to access medical assistance immediately upon release.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1764, § 2, effective June 2.

26-1-136.5. Menstrual hygiene products for a person in custody - definition.

A department of human services facility shall provide whichever menstrual hygiene products are requested by a person in the custody of a department of human services facility to the person in custody at no expense to the person in custody. The department of human services facility shall not impose any condition or restriction on a person in custody's access to menstrual hygiene products.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "menstrual hygiene products" means tampons, menstrual pads, sanitary napkins, and pantiliners.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1224), ch. 131, p. 589, § 5, effective April 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1224, see section 1 of chapter 131, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.